District of Columbia statutes.
42-606

Covenant of quiet enjoyment.

A covenant by the grantor in a deed of land, “that the said grantee shall quietly enjoy said land,” shall have the same effect as if he had covenanted that the said grantee, his heirs, and assigns, shall, at any and all times after March 3, 1901, peaceably and quietly enter upon, have, hold, and enjoy the land conveyed by the deed or intended to be so conveyed, with all the rights, privileges, and appurtenances thereunto belonging, and to receive the rents and profits thereof, to and for his and their use and benefit, without any eviction, interruption, suit, claim, or demand whatsoever by the said grantor, his heirs or assigns, or any other person or persons whatever.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1269, ch. 854, § 508

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-506.
1973 Ed., § 45-306.